Massachusetts, session 194th, H1055.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a special commission to examine the status of wild striped
bass in the Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. The commission shall examine and assess the impact that commercial
harvesting and recreational fishing have upon the population and viability of wild striped bass in
the Commonwealth.
SECTION 3. (The commission shall consist of a member of the Senate appointed by the
President of the Senate; a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives; a member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Minority Leader;
a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the House Minority leader; the Secretary
of 2

of the Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs or their designee; the Secretary of
the Executive Office of Health and Human Services or their designee; the Secretary of the
Executive Office of Economic Development or their designee; a representative from the
commercial fishing industry; a representative from the sports fishing industry; a representative of
Stripers Forever, 3 independent representatives from the marine science industry who are experts
in fisheries, to be chosen by the governor. The members of the commission shall be appointed
not later 90 days after the effective date of this act and shall serve until the completion of the
report.
SECTION 4. The commission shall hold public hearings in Gloucester, New Bedford,
Boston, and on Cape Cod to assist in the collection and evaluation of data and testimony.
SECTION 5. The commission shall prepare a written report detailing its findings and
recommendations, if any, together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry those
recommendations into effect. The commission shall submit its report to the governor, the
secretary of the commonwealth, the clerks of the Senate and House of Representatives, the house
and senate committees on ways and means, and the joint committee on environment, natural
resources and agriculture not later than December 31 of 2026.
of 2